Connecticut, session 2026, SB00260.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 22-364 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) No owner or keeper of any dog or livestock as defined in section
22-381 shall allow such dog or livestock to roam at large upon the land
of another and not under control of the owner or keeper or the agent of
the owner or keeper, nor allow such dog or livestock to roam at large on
any portion of any public highway and not attended or under control of
such owner or keeper or an agent of such owner or keeper, provided
[nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit or prohibit the use
of hunting dogs during the open hunting or training season] this section
shall not apply to the use of a (1) hunting dog during the open hunting
or training season, (2) dog used in the handling and control of livestock,
or (3) dog engaged in a search or rescue operation. The unauthorized
presence of any dog or livestock on the land of any person other than
the owner or keeper of such dog or livestock or on any portion of a
public highway when such dog or livestock is not attended by or under
the control of such owner or keeper, shall be prima facie evidence of a
violation of the provisions of this subsection. [Violation of any provision
of this subsection shall be an infraction.] The animal control officer or
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 260
regional animal control officer appointed pursuant to section 22-328, 22-
331 or 22-331a, as applicable, of any city or town in which any such dog
or livestock is found roaming at large may, in addition to any other
remedies provided by law, seek an order enforcing the provisions of this
section, including an injunction, from the superior court of the judicial
district in which such dog or livestock is found roaming at large.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) of this section concerning livestock
shall be an infraction.
(c) (1) Any owner or keeper of any dog who violates subsection (a) of
this section shall be (A) fined (i) not more than three hundred fifty
dollars for a first violation, or (ii) not more than five hundred dollars for
a subsequent violation, or (B) guilty of a class C misdemeanor for a third
or subsequent violation that occurs during the one-year period
following the immediate prior violation.
[(b)] (2) Any owner or keeper of any dog who, knowing of the vicious
propensities of such dog and having violated [the provisions of]
subsection (a) of this section within the preceding year, intentionally or
recklessly violates [the provisions of] subsection (a) of this section shall
be fined not more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned not more
than six months, or both, if such dog, while roaming at large, causes
physical injury to another person and such other person was not teasing,
tormenting or abusing such dog.
Sec. 2. Subsection (b) of section 51-164n of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, any person
who is alleged to have committed (1) a violation under the provisions of
section 1-9, 1-10, 1-11, 2-71h, 4b-13, 7-13, 7-14, 7-35 or 7-41, subsection (c)
of section 7-66, section 7-83, 7-147h, 7-148, 7-283, 7-325, 7-393, 8-12, 8-25,
8-27, 9-63, 9-322, 9-350, 10-185, 10-193, 10-197, 10-198, 10-230, 10-251, 10-
254, 10a-35, 12-52, 12-54, 12-129b or 12-170aa, subdivision (3) of
subsection (e) of section 12-286, section 12-286a, 12-292, 12-314b or 12-
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 260
326g, subdivision (4) of section 12-408, subdivision (3), (5) or (6) of
section 12-411, section 12-435c, 12-476a, 12-476b, 12-476c, 12-487, 13a-
26b, 13a-71, 13a-107, 13a-113, 13a-114, 13a-115, 13a-117b, 13a-123, 13a-
124, 13a-139, 13a-140, 13a-143b, 13a-253, 13a-263 or 13b-39f, subsection
(f) of section 13b-42, section 13b-90 or 13b-100, subsection (a) of section
13b-108, section 13b-221 or 13b-292, subsection (a) or (b) of section 13b-
324, section 13b-336, 13b-337, 13b-338, 13b-410a, 13b-410b or 13b-410c,
subsection (a), (b) or (c) of section 13b-412, section 13b-414 or 14-4,
subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 14-12, subsection (d) of
section 14-12, subsection (f) of section 14-12a, subsection (a) of section
14-15a, section 14-16c, 14-20a or 14-27a, subsection (f) of section 14-34a,
subsection (d) of section 14-35, section 14-43, 14-44j, 14-49, 14-50a, 14-58
or 14-62a, subsection (b) of section 14-66, section 14-66a or 14-67a,
subsection (g) of section 14-80, subsection (f) or (i) of section 14-80h,
section 14-97a or 14-98, subsection (a), (b) or (d) of section 14-100a,
section 14-100b, 14-103a, 14-106a, 14-106c, 14-145a, 14-146, 14-152, 14-
153, 14-161 or 14-163b, subsection (f) of section 14-164i, section 14-213b
or 14-219, subdivision (1) of section 14-223a, subsection (d) of section 14-
224, section 14-240 or 14-250, subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of section
14-251, section 14-253a, 14-261a, 14-262, 14-264, 14-266, 14-267a, 14-269,
14-270, 14-272b, 14-274, 14-275 or 14-275a, subsection (c) of section 14-
275c, section 14-276, subsection (a) or (b) of section 14-277, section 14-
278, 14-279 or 14-280, subsection (b), (e) or (h) of section 14-283, section
14-283d, 14-283e, 14-283f, 14-283g, 14-289l, 14-291, 14-293b, 14-296aa, 14-
298a, 14-300, 14-300d, 14-300f, 14-319, 14-320, 14-321, 14-325a, 14-326, 14-
330 or 14-332a, subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of section 14-386a, section 15-
15e, 15-25 or 15-33, subdivision (1) of section 15-97, subsection (a) of
section 15-115, section 16-15, 16-16, 16-44, 16-256e, 16-278 or 16a-15,
subsection (a) of section 16a-21, section 16a-22, subsection (a) or (b) of
section 16a-22h, section 16a-106, 17a-24, 17a-145, 17a-149 or 17a-152,
subsection (b) of section 17a-227, section 17a-465, subsection (c) of
section 17a-488, section 17b-124, 17b-131, 17b-137, 19a-33, 19a-39 or 19a-
87, subsection (b) of section 19a-87a, section 19a-91, 19a-102a, 19a-102b,
19a-105, 19a-107, 19a-113, 19a-215, 19a-216a, 19a-219, 19a-222, 19a-224,
19a-286, 19a-287, 19a-297, 19a-301, 19a-309, 19a-335, 19a-336, 19a-338,
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 260
19a-339, 19a-340, 19a-425, 19a-442, 19a-502, 19a-565, 20-7a, 20-14, 20-
153a, 20-158, 20-231, 20-233, 20-249, 20-257, 20-265, 20-324e, 20-329c or
20-329g, subsection (b) of section 20-334, section 20-341l, 20-366, 20-482,
20-597, 20-608, 20-610, 20-623, 21-1, 21-38, 21-39, 21-43, 21-47, 21-48 or
21-63, subsection (d) of section 21-71, section 21-76a or 21-100,
subsection (c) of section 21a-2, subdivision (1) of section 21a-19, section
21a-20 or 21a-21, subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 21a-25,
section 21a-26, subsection (a) of section 21a-37, section 21a-46, 21a-61,
21a-63, 21a-70b or 21a-77, subsection (b) or (c) of section 21a-79, section
21a-85 or 21a-154, subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 21a-159,
section 21a-278b, subsection (c), (d) or (e) of section 21a-279a, section
21a-415a, 21a-421eee, 21a-421fff or 21a-421hhh, subsection (a) of section
21a-430, section 22-12b, 22-13, 22-14, 22-15, 22-16, 22-26g, 22-30, 22-34,
100 22-35, 22-36, 22-38, 22-39, 22-39f, 22-49, 22-54, 22-61j or 22-61l,
101 subdivision (1) of subsection (n) of section 22-61l, subsection (f) of
102 section 22-61m, subdivision (1) of subsection (f) of section 22-61m,
103 section 22-84, 22-89, 22-90, 22-96, 22-98, 22-99, 22-100 or 22-111o,
104 subsection (d) of section 22-118l, section 22-167, subsection (c) of section
105 22-277, section 22-278, 22-279, 22-280a, 22-318a, 22-320h, 22-324a or 22-
106 326, subsection (b), subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (e) or subsection
107 (g) of section 22-344, subsection (a) or (b) of section 22-344b, subsection
108 (d) of section 22-344d, section 22-344f, 22-350a, 22-354, 22-359, 22-366,
109 22-391, 22-413, 22-414, 22-415, 22-415c, 22a-66a or 22a-246, subsection (a)
110 of section 22a-250, section 22a-256g, subsection (e) of section 22a-256h,
111 section 22a-363, [or] subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of subsection
112 (c) of section 22-364, as amended by this act, section 22a-381d,
113 subsections (c) and (d) of section 22a-381e, section 22a-449, 22a-450, 22a-
114 461, 23-4b, 23-38, 23-45, 23-46 or 23-61b, subsection (a) or subdivision (1)
115 of subsection (c) of section 23-65, section 25-37 or 25-40, subsection (a) of
116 section 25-43, section 25-43d, 25-135, 26-18, 26-19, 26-21, 26-31, 26-40, 26-
117 40a, 26-42, 26-43, 26-49, 26-54, 26-55, 26-56, 26-58 or 26-59, subdivision
118 (1) of subsection (d) of section 26-61, section 26-64, subdivision (1) of
119 section 26-76, section 26-79, 26-87, 26-89, 26-91, 26-94, 26-97, 26-98, 26-
120 104, 26-105, 26-107, 26-114a, 26-117, subsection (b) of section 26-127, 26-
121 128, 26-128a, 26-131, 26-132, 26-138, 26-139 or 26-141, subdivision (1) of
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 260
122 section 26-186, section 26-207, 26-215, 26-217 or 26-224a, subdivision (1)
123 of section 26-226, section 26-227, 26-230, 26-231, 26-232, 26-244, 26-257a,
124 26-260, 26-276, 26-280, 26-284, 26-285, 26-286, 26-287, 26-288, 26-290, 26-
125 291a, 26-292, 26-294, 27-107, 28-13, 29-6a, 29-16, 29-17, 29-25, 29-143o, 29-
126 143z or 29-156a, subsection (b), (d), (e), (g) or (h) of section 29-161q,
127 section 29-161y or 29-161z, subdivision (1) of section 29-198, section 29-
128 210, 29-243 or 29-277, subsection (c) of section 29-291c, section 29-316 or
129 29-318, subsection (b) of section 29-335a, section 29-381, 30-19f, 30-48a or
130 30-86a, subsection (b) of section 30-89, subsection (c) or (d) of section 30-
131 117, section 31-3, 31-10, 31-11, 31-12, 31-13, 31-14, 31-15, 31-16, 31-18, 31-
132 23, 31-24, 31-25, 31-32, 31-36, 31-47 or 31-48, subsection (b) of section 31-
133 48b, section 31-51, 31-51g, 31-52, 31-52a, 31-53 or 31-54, subsection (a) or
134 (c) of section 31-69, section 31-70, 31-74, 31-75, 31-76, 31-76a, 31-89b or
135 31-134, subsection (i) of section 31-273, section 31-288, 31-348, 33-624, 33-
136 1017, 34-13d or 34-412, subdivision (1) of section 35-20, subsection (a) of
137 section 36a-57, subsection (b) of section 36a-665, section 36a-699, 36a-
138 739, 36a-787, 38a-2 or 38a-140, subsection (a) or (b) of section 38a-278,
139 section 38a-479qq, 38a-479rr, 38a-506, 38a-548, 38a-626, 38a-680, 38a-713,
140 38a-733, 38a-764, 38a-786, 38a-828, 38a-829, 38a-885, 42-133hh, 42-470 or
141 42-480, subsection (a) or (c) of section 43-16q, section 45a-283, 45a-450,
142 45a-634 or 45a-658, subdivision (13) or (14) of section 46a-54, section 46a-
143 59, 46a-81b, 46b-22, 46b-24, 46b-34, 46b-38d, 47-34a, 47-47 or 47-53,
144 subsection (i) of section 47a-21, subdivision (1) of subsection (k) of
145 section 47a-21, section 49-2a, 49-8a, 49-16, 52-143 or 52-289, subsection
146 (j) of section 52-362, section 53-133, 53-199, 53-212a, 53-249a, 53-252, 53-
147 264, 53-280, 53-290a, 53-302a, 53-303e, 53-311a, 53-314, 53-321, 53-322, 53-
148 323 or 53-331, subsection (b) of section 53-343a, section 53-344,
149 subsection (b) or (c) of section 53-344b, subsection (b) of section 53-345a,
150 section 53-377, 53-422 or 53-450 or subsection (i) of section 54-36a, or (2)
151 a violation under the provisions of chapter 268, or (3) a violation of any
152 regulation adopted in accordance with the provisions of section 12-484,
153 12-487 or 13b-410, or (4) a violation of any ordinance, regulation or
154 bylaw of any town, city or borough, except violations of building codes,
155 the health code or an ordinance described in subdivision (5) of this
156 subsection, for which the penalty exceeds ninety dollars but does not
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 260
157 exceed two hundred fifty dollars, unless such town, city or borough has
158 established a payment and hearing procedure for such violation
159 pursuant to section 7-152c, or (5) a violation of any ordinance adopted
160 by a town, city or borough pursuant to section 14-224a, 14-390 or 14-
161 390m for which the penalty does not exceed two thousand dollars,
162 unless such town, city or borough has established a payment and
163 hearing procedure for such violation pursuant to section 7-152c, shall
164 follow the procedures set forth in this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 22-364
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 51-164n(b)
JUD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6